District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Gardner Bishop Elementary School Redesignation Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401 and 422(b) through (e) of the Street and Alley Closing
and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C.
Official Code §§ 9-204.01 and 9-204.22(b) through (e)) (“Act”), and notwithstanding section
422(a) of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.22(a)), the Council designates the school in Lot 33
in Square 792, located at 301 North Carolina Avenue SE, Washington, DC 20003, bounded by
North Carolina Avenue, SE, 4th Street, SE, D Street, SE, and 3rd Street, SE in Ward 6, as
“Gardner Bishop Elementary School”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2